Missouri, session 2026, SB948.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 431.061, RSMo, is repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
1.340, 1.341, and 431.061, to read as follows:
1.340. 1. A parent has a fundamental liberty and
fundamental interest in the care, custody, and control of
such parent's child, including the right to direct the
upbringing, education, health care, and mental health of the
child free from government interference.
2. A governmental authority shall not restrict the
fundamental right of a parent to direct the upbringing,
education, health care, and mental health of that parent's
child, unless the governmental authority demonstrates that
application of the restriction to the parent and the child
is essential to further a compelling governmental interest
and is the least restrictive means of furthering that
compelling governmental interest.
3. As used in this section, "parent" means a natural
parent, a parent by adoption, or an individual who been
granted exclusive right and authority over the welfare of a
child under state law.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 948 2
4. As used in this section, "child" means any
unemancipated person who has not attained the age of
eighteen years.
5. This section applies to all state and local laws,
resolutions, and ordinances and to the implementation of
such laws, resolutions, and ordinances, whether statutory or
otherwise, and whether adopted before or after August 28,
2026.
6. Nothing in this section or section 1.341 shall be
construed as allowing any person to cause physical injury to
another person, to possess a weapon otherwise prohibited by
law, to fail to provide monetary support for a child, or to
fail to provide health care for a child suffering from a
life-threatening condition.
1.341. 1. All parental rights are exclusively
reserved to a parent of a child without obstruction by or
interference from this state, any political subdivision of
this state, any other governmental entity, or any other
institution, including without limitation, the following
rights and responsibilities:
(1) To direct the education of the child, including
the right to choose a public school, private school,
parochial school, parish school, home school, or family-
paced education school, and the right to make reasonable
choices within public schools for the education of the child;
(2) To access and review all written and electronic
educational records relating to the child that are
controlled by or in the possession of a school;
(3) To direct the upbringing of the child;
(4) To direct the moral or religious training of the
child;

SB 948 3
(5) To make and consent in writing to all physical and
mental health care decisions for the child;
(6) To access and review all health and medical
records of the child;
(7) To consent in writing before a biometric scan of
the child is made, shared, or stored;
(8) To consent in writing before any record of the
child's blood or deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is created,
stored, or shared, unless authorized pursuant to a court
order;
(9) To consent in writing before any governmental
authority makes a video or voice recording of the child,
unless the video or voice recording is made during or as a
part of:
(a) A court proceeding;
(b) A law enforcement investigation;
(c) A forensic interview in a criminal or department
of social services investigation;
(d) The security or surveillance of buildings or
grounds; or
(e) A photo identification card;
(10) To be notified promptly if any governmental
authority suspects that abuse, neglect, or any criminal
offense has been committed against the child, unless the
governmental authority reasonably believes that notifying
the parent is likely to endanger the life or physical safety
of the child;
(11) To opt the child out of any personal analysis,
evaluation, survey, or data collection by a school district
that would capture data for inclusion in the statewide
longitudinal student data system except what is necessary

SB 948 4
and essential for establishing a student's educational
record;
(12) The right to have the child excused from school
attendance for religious purposes; and
(13) The right to participate in parent-teacher
organizations and other school organizations that are
sanctioned by the board of education of a school district.
2. Except for law enforcement personnel, a
governmental authority shall not encourage or coerce a child
to withhold information from the child's parent; nor shall a
governmental authority withhold from a child's parent
information that is relevant to the physical, emotional, or
mental health of the child.
3. A parent who believes his or her rights have been
violated under this section or section 1.340 may assert that
violation as a claim or defense in a judicial or
administrative proceeding, regardless of whether the
government is a party to the proceeding, and obtain
appropriate relief against the government, including
declaratory relief, injunctive relief, compensatory damages,
and reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
431.061. 1. In addition to such other persons as may
be so authorized and empowered, any one of the following
persons if otherwise competent to contract, is authorized
and empowered to consent, either orally or otherwise, to any
surgical, medical, or other treatment or procedures,
including immunizations, not prohibited by law:
(1) Any adult eighteen years of age or older for
himself;
(2) Any parent for his minor child in his legal
custody;

SB 948 5
(3) Any minor who has been lawfully married and any
minor parent or legal custodian of a child for himself, his
child and any child in his legal custody;
(4) Any minor for [himself] herself in case of[:
(a) Pregnancy, but excluding abortions;
(b) Venereal disease;
(c) Drug or substance abuse including those referred
to in chapter 195] pregnancy, but excluding abortions;
(5) Any adult standing in loco parentis, whether
serving formally or not, for his minor charge in case of
emergency as defined in section 431.063;
(6) Any guardian of the person for his ward;
(7) Any relative caregiver of a minor child as
provided for under section 431.058.
2. The provisions of sections 431.061 and 431.063
shall be liberally construed, and all relationships set
forth in subsection 1 of this section shall include the
adoptive and step-relationship as well as the natural
relationship and the relationship by the half blood as well
as by the whole blood.
3. A consent by one person so authorized and empowered
shall be sufficient notwithstanding that there are other
persons so authorized and empowered or that such other
persons shall refuse or decline to consent or shall protest
against the proposed surgical, medical or other treatment or
procedures.
4. Any person acting in good faith and not having been
put on notice to the contrary shall be justified in relying
on the representations of any person purporting to give such
consent, including, but not limited to, his identity, his

SB 948 6
age, his marital status, and his relationship to any other
person for whom the consent is purportedly given.
✓